Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.450

Injunctions, specific performance if breach or threatened breach by member.

In the event of any such breach or threatened breach of such marketing contract by a member the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance thereof. Pending the adjudication of such an action and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

[ 1959 c 312 s 45.]